Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.140

Duties and responsibilities imposed by other acts.

Any duties and responsibilities which by other statutes are imposed upon a planning commission may, in a code city, be performed by a planning agency, as provided in this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.140.]